Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
Article 2 Minimum Requirements

25-3-20.
Legislative intent.

It is the intention of the General Assembly of Georgia to establish minimum requirements for all fire departments operating in this state. The General Assembly recognizes that fire departments operating in this state cannot function effectively and efficiently as full-time fire departments without meeting or exceeding the minimum requirements established by this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-3-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1000, § 3.

25-3-21.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Executive director” means the executive director of the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council.

“Fire department” means any fire department which is authorized to exercise the general and emergency powers enumerated in Code Sections 25-3-1 and 25-3-2.

“Fire department” also means any department, agency, organization, or company operating in this state with the intent and purpose of carrying out the duties, functions, powers, and responsibilities normally associated with a fire department. These duties, functions, powers, and responsibilities include but are not limited to the protection of life and property against fire, explosions, or other hazards.

“Firefighter” means any able-bodied person at least 18 years of age who has been duly appointed by a legally constituted fire department and who has the responsibility of preventing and suppressing fires, protecting life and property, and performing other duties enumerated in Code Sections 25-3-1 and 25-3-2.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-3-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1000, § 3; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1493, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 341, § 1.

25-3-22.
Notification and documentation that organization meets requirements; issuance of certificate of compliance.

In order for a fire department employing full-time firefighters or part-time firefighters to be legally organized to operate in the State of Georgia, the chief administrative officer of the fire department shall notify and submit all required documentation to the executive director that demonstrates that the organization meets the minimum requirements specified in Code Section 25-3-23 and the rules and regulations of the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council to function as a fire department. If the executive director is satisfied that the fire department meets the minimum requirements contained in Code Section 25-3-23 and the rules and regulations of the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council, he or she shall recommend to the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council that a certificate of compliance be issued by the council to the fire department. If the council issues such certificate of compliance, the fire department shall be authorized to exercise the general and emergency powers set forth in Code Sections 25-3-1 and 25-3-2.

In order for a volunteer fire department to be legally organized to operate in the State of Georgia, the chief administrative officer of the fire department shall notify and submit all required documentation to the executive director that demonstrates that the organization meets the minimum requirements specified in Code Section 25-3-23 and the rules and regulations of the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council to function as a volunteer fire department. If the executive director is satisfied that the volunteer fire department meets the minimum requirements contained in Code Section 25-3-23 and the rules and regulations of the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council, he or she shall recommend to the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council that a certificate of compliance be issued by such council to the volunteer fire department. If the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council issues such certificate of compliance, the fire department shall be authorized to exercise the general and emergency powers set forth in Code Sections 25-3-1 and 25-3-2.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-3-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1000, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 341, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 560, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 888, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 64, § 1/HB 727; Ga. L. 2020, p. 515, § 1/SB 342.

The 2016 amendment,

effective April 26, 2016, in the first sentence of this Code section, substituted “notify and submit all required documentation to the executive director that demonstrates that” for “notify the executive director that” near the middle, and substituted “executive director” for “council” at the beginning of the second sentence.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a); inserted “employing full-time firefighters or part-time firefighters” in the first sentence of subsection (a); and added subsection (b).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U.L. Rev. 55 (2016).

25-3-23.
General requirements; equipment and clothing; insurance.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, in order to be legally organized:

A fire department shall comply with the following requirements:

Be established to provide fire and other emergency and nonemergency services in accordance with standards specified by the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council, for fire departments employing full-time firefighters or part-time firefighters, or the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council, for fire departments solely utilizing volunteer firefighters, and the applicable local government;

Be capable of providing fire protection 24 hours a day, 365 days per year;

Be responsible for a defined area of operations depicted on a map located at the fire station, which area of operations shall have been approved and designated by the governing authority of the applicable county, municipality, or other political subdivision in the case of any county, municipal, or volunteer fire department; and

Be staffed with a sufficient number of full-time, part-time, or volunteer firefighters who have successfully completed basic firefighter training as specified by the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council, for fire departments employing full-time firefighters or part-time firefighters, or the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council, for fire departments solely utilizing volunteer firefighters; and

A fire department shall possess the following items of approved equipment and protective clothing:

A minimum of one fully equipped, operable pumper with a capacity of at least 750 GPM at 150 PSI and a tank capacity of a minimum of 250 gallons; provided, however, that previously approved fire apparatus which does not meet such minimum standards may be used in lieu of the minimum required pumper until replaced by the local authority;

A minimum of equipment, appliances, adapters, and accessories necessary to perform and carry out the duties and responsibilities of a fire department set forth in Code Sections 25-3-1 and 25-3-2 as approved by the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council, for fire departments employing full-time firefighters or part-time firefighters, or the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council, for fire departments solely utilizing volunteer firefighters;

A minimum of two approved self-contained breathing apparatus for each pumping apparatus as approved by the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council, for fire departments employing full-time firefighters or part-time firefighters, or the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council, for fire departments solely utilizing volunteer firefighters; and

A minimum issue of sufficient personal protective clothing to permit each member to perform safely the duties of a firefighter.

A legally organized fire department shall provide and maintain sufficient insurance coverage on each member of the fire department to pay claims for injuries sustained en route to, during, and returning from fire calls or other emergencies and disasters and scheduled training sessions.

As used in this paragraph, the term:

“Cancer” means bladder, blood, brain, breast, cervical, esophageal, intestinal, kidney, lymphatic, lung, prostate, rectum, respiratory tract, skin, testicular, and thyroid cancer; leukemia; multiple myeloma; or non-Hodgkin’s lymphoma.

“Firefighter” means a firefighter as defined in Code Section 25-4-2.

“Volunteer” means a volunteer as defined in Code Section 25-4-2.

On and after January 1, 2018, a legally organized fire department shall provide and maintain sufficient insurance coverage on each member of the fire department who is a firefighter to pay claims for cancer diagnosed after having served 12 consecutive months as a firefighter with such fire department. Such insurance benefits shall include at minimum the following:

(I) A lump sum benefit of $25,000.00 subject to limitations specified in the insurance contract and based on severity of cancer and payable to such firefighter upon submission to the insurance carrier or other payor of acceptable proof of diagnosis by a physician board certified in the medical specialty appropriate for the type of cancer involved that there are one or more malignant tumors characterized by the uncontrollable and abnormal growth and spread of malignant cells with invasion of normal tissue and that:

Payable as a result of a specific injury or illness to begin six months after disability and submission to the insurance carrier or other payor of acceptable proof of disability precluding service as a firefighter and continuing for up to 36 consecutive monthly payments:

A monthly benefit equal to 60 percent of the member’s monthly salary as an employed firefighter with the fire department or a monthly benefit of $5,000.00, whichever is less; or

If the member is a volunteer, a monthly benefit of $1,500.00.

The combined total of all benefits received by any firefighter under subdivisions (B)(i)(I) and (B)(i)(II) of this paragraph during his or her lifetime shall not exceed $50,000.00.

With the exception of the benefit under subdivision (B)(ii)(I) of this paragraph, any person who was simultaneously a member of more than one fire department at the time of diagnosis shall not be entitled to receive benefits under this paragraph from or on behalf of more than one of such fire departments. In the event a volunteer of one fire department is simultaneously employed by another fire department, the fire department for which such person is a volunteer shall not be required to maintain the coverage on such volunteer otherwise required under this subsection during the period of such employment. Any member who receives benefits under division (ii) of subparagraph (B) of this paragraph may be required to have his or her condition reevaluated; in the event any such reevaluation reveals that such person has regained the ability to perform duties as a firefighter, then his or her benefits under division (ii) of subparagraph (B) of this paragraph shall cease. Benefits under said division shall also cease upon the death of such person. A member who, after at least one year as a firefighter, departs from employment, ceases to be an active volunteer, or retires shall be entitled to continue his or her coverages under this paragraph through a continuation or conversion to individual coverage. The departing member shall be responsible for payment of all premiums.

In addition to any other purpose authorized under Chapter 8 of Title 33, county governing authorities and municipal governing authorities may use proceeds from county and municipal taxes imposed under said chapter for purposes of providing insurance pursuant to this paragraph.

Funds received as premiums for the coverages specified in this paragraph shall not be subject to premium taxes under Chapter 8 of Title 33.

The computation of premium amounts by an insurer for the coverages under this paragraph shall be subject to generally accepted adjustments from insurance underwriting.

The firefighter has terminal cancer, is expected to die within 24 months or less from the date of diagnosis, and will not benefit from, or has exhausted, curative therapy; or

There is a tumor of the prostate, provided that it is treated with radical prostatectomy or external beam therapy; and

The benefit under subdivision (I) or (II) of this division, as applicable, shall be subordinate to any other benefit actually paid to the firefighter for such disability from any other source, not including insurance purchased solely by the firefighter, and shall be limited to the difference between the amount of such other paid benefit and the amount specified under subdivision (I) or (II) of this division, as applicable.

(a)

Surgery, radiotherapy, or chemotherapy is medically necessary;

(b)

There is metastasis; or

(II)

A lump sum benefit of $6,250.00 subject to limitations specified in the insurance contract and based on severity of cancer and payable to such firefighter upon submission to the insurance carrier or other payor of acceptable proof of diagnosis by a physician board certified in the medical specialty appropriate for the type of cancer involved that:

(a)

There is carcinoma in situ such that surgery, radiotherapy, or chemotherapy has been determined to be medically necessary;

(b)

There are malignant tumors which are treated by endoscopic procedures alone;

(c)

There are malignant melanomas; or

(c) (1)

The Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council shall be authorized to adopt such rules and regulations for fire departments employing full-time firefighters or part-time firefighters as are reasonable and necessary to implement the provisions of this Code section and to establish and modify minimum requirements for all fire departments operating in this state, provided that such requirements are equal to or exceed the requirements provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section.

(2)

The Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council shall be authorized to adopt such rules and regulations for fire departments solely utilizing volunteer firefighters as are reasonable and necessary to implement the provisions of this Code section and to establish and modify minimum requirements for all volunteer fire departments operating in this state, provided that such requirements are equal to or exceed the requirements provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-3-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1000, § 3; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 25; Ga. L. 1990, p. 354, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 341, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 560, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 888, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 25/HB 95; Ga. L. 2017, p. 336, § 1/HB 146; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 25/SB 365; Ga. L. 2020, p. 515, § 2/SB 342.

The 2017 amendment,

effective January 1, 2018, substituted the present provisions of subsection (b) for the former provisions, which read: “A legally organized fire department shall purchase and maintain sufficient insurance coverage on each member of the fire department to pay claims for injuries sustained en route to, during, and returning from fire calls or other emergencies and disasters and scheduled training sessions.”; and, in subsection (c), substituted “The” for “On and after July 1, 1998, the,” at the beginning and substituted “to adopt such rules and regulations as are reasonable and necessary to implement the provisions of this Code section and” for “, by rules and regulations,” in the middle.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation at the end of subdivision (b)(2)(B)(i)(II)(a).

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subparagraph (a)(1)(A), deleted “solely” following “specified” and inserted “, for fire departments employing full-time firefighters or part-time firefighters, or the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council, for fire departments solely utilizing volunteer firefighters,”; inserted “, for fire departments employing full-time firefighters or part-time firefighters, or the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council, for fire departments solely utilizing volunteer firefighters” in subparagraphs (a)(1)(D), (a)(2)(B), and (a)(2)(C); designated the existing provisions of subsection (c) as paragraph (c)(1); inserted “for fire departments employing full-time firefighters or part-time firefighters” in paragraph (c)(1); and added paragraph (c)(2).

25-3-24.
Authority of executive director to determine compliance.

The executive director may consult with and consider the recommendations of the director of the State Forestry Commission, the director of the Georgia Fire Academy, the state fire marshal, and the governing authority of any county or municipality in which the fire department is located to determine if individual fire departments are complying with the minimum provisions of this article and serving the best interests of the citizens of the area of its operations.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-3-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1000, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 341, § 4; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 25/HB 90.

The 2015 amendment,

effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “State Forestry Commission” for “Georgia Forestry Commission” near the beginning of this Code section.

25-3-25.
Suspension or revocation of certificate of compliance; hearing by aggrieved departments; enforcement of suspensions or revocations.

The certificate of compliance issued by the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council or the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council shall be subject to suspension or revocation by the applicable council at any time it receives satisfactory evidence that the fire department is not maintaining sufficient personnel, equipment, or insurance required by Code Section 25-3-23, or the rules and regulations of the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council, for fire departments employing full-time firefighters or part-time firefighters, or the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council, for fire departments solely utilizing volunteer firefighters, pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 25-3-23.

The chief administrative officer of any fire department aggrieved by a decision of the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council, for fire departments employing full-time firefighters or part-time firefighters, or the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council, for fire departments solely utilizing volunteer firefighters, under subsection (a) of this Code section may, within 30 days of the date of such decision, request a hearing on the matter before the applicable council. Following a hearing before the applicable council, the chief administrative officer of the fire department affected shall be served with a written decision of the applicable council announcing whether the certificate of compliance shall remain revoked or suspended or whether it shall be reinstated.

The Georgia Firefighters Standards and Training Council, for fire departments employing full-time firefighters or part-time firefighters, or the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council, for fire departments solely utilizing volunteer firefighters, shall not suspend or revoke any certificate of compliance for failure to meet firefighter training requirements when such failure was due to unavailability of required training from or through the Georgia Fire Academy.

The Georgia Firefighters Standards and Training Council, for fire departments employing full-time firefighters or part-time firefighters, or the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council, for fire departments solely utilizing volunteer firefighters, may refer suspensions or revocations to the Attorney General for enforcement. Upon referral from a council, the Attorney General may bring a civil action to enjoin any organization which is not in compliance with the applicable requirements of this chapter from performing any or all firefighting functions until such requirements are met by such organization.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-3-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1000, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 341, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 560, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 888, § 3; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 25/HB 95; Ga. L. 2020, p. 515, § 3/SB 342.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), substituted “Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council or the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council” for “council”, inserted “applicable”, and inserted “, for fire departments employing full-time firefighters or part-time firefighters, or the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council, for fire departments solely utilizing volunteer firefighters,”; in subsection (b), substituted “Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council, for fire departments employing full-time firefighters or part-time firefighters, or the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council, for fire departments solely utilizing volunteer firefighters,” for “council” and inserted “applicable” three times; substituted “Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council, for fire departments employing full-time firefighters or part-time firefighters, or the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council, for fire departments solely utilizing volunteer firefighters,” for “council” in subsections (c) and (d); and substituted “a council” for “the council” in the second sentence of subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 515, § 3/SB 342, which amended this Code section, purported to amend Code Section 24-3-25 but actually amended Code Section 25-3-25.

25-3-26.
Duty of executive director to cooperate with fire department.

The executive director shall cooperate with newly formed and existing fire departments to ensure that all fire departments in this state are in compliance with the provisions of this article by July 1, 1986.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-3-26

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1000, § 3; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 25; Ga. L. 1995, p. 341, § 6.

25-3-27.
Construction of article.

This article shall not be construed to amend, modify, or repeal any of the provisions of Chapter 4 of this title, known as the “Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Act,” nor shall this article be construed to restrict the requirements of any other provisions relating to fire departments, equipment, or personnel.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-3-27

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1000, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 25.